Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-4,124
State committee; notification.

The state committee shall, within thirty days after holding the hearings provided for in section 79-4,122, notify the affected school districts whether or not it approves or disapproves such plan or plans.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 35;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 24.